Hawaii statutes.
GENERAL
PROVISIONS

§806-76 Court proceedings; reports to
county clerk. Whenever in any circuit court, family court, or district
court any citizen of eighteen years of age or over is:

(1) Convicted of any felony and sentenced to a term
of imprisonment; or

(2) Adjudged insane or feeble-minded or otherwise
legally incompetent,

the clerk of the court, in each case within twenty
days thereafter, shall report to the clerk of the county in which the citizen
is located the fact of the conviction or adjudication and the citizen's name,
any known aliases, date of birth, social security number, and to the extent
readily ascertainable by the clerk of the court, the residence address or last
known residence address. For a citizen convicted of any felony and sentenced
to a term of imprisonment, copies of the judgment of conviction and sentence
and mittimus (warrant of commitment) shall be provided to the clerk of the
county. [L 1933, c 67, pt of §2; RL 1935, §5535; RL 1945, §10841; am L 1955, c
191, §1(gg); RL 1955, §258-51; HRS §711-96; am L 1970, c 188, §39; ren L 1972,
c 9, pt of §1 and am L 1972, c 109, §2; am L 2006, c 253, §2]

Cross References

Paragraph (2), see chapters 333F, 334, and 551.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next